California statutes. Corporations Code
The certificate of amendment shall establish the wording of the amendment or amended articles by one or more of the following means:

(a) By stating that the articles shall be amended to read as therein set forth in full.

(b) By stating that any provision of the articles, which shall be identified by the numerical or other designation given it in the articles or by stating the wording thereof, shall be stricken from the articles or shall be amended to read as set forth in the certificate.

(c) By stating that the provisions set forth therein shall be added to the articles.

If the purpose of the amendment is to reclassify, cancel, exchange, or otherwise change outstanding memberships the amended articles shall state the effect thereof on outstanding memberships.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7817.

Upon the filing of the certificate of amendment, the articles shall be amended in accordance with the certificate and any change, reclassification or cancellation of memberships shall be effected, and a copy of the certificate, certified by the Secretary of State, is prima facie evidence of the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of the amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7818.

A corporation formed for a limited period may at any time subsequent to the expiration of the term of its corporate existence, extend the term of its existence by an amendment to its articles removing any provision limiting the term of its existence and providing for perpetual existence. If the filing of the certificate of amendment providing for perpetual existence would be prohibited if it were original articles by the provisions of Section 7122, the Secretary of State shall not file such certificate unless, by the same or a concurrently filed certificate of amendment, the articles of such corporation are amended to adopt a new available name. For the purpose of the adoption of any such amendment, persons who have been functioning as directors of such corporation shall be considered to have been validly elected even though their election may have occurred after the expiration of the original term of the corporate existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7819.

(a) A corporation may restate in a single certificate the entire text of its articles as amended by filing an officers’ certificate or, in circumstances where incorporators or the board may amend a corporation’s articles pursuant to Sections 7811 and 7815, a certificate signed and verified by a majority of the incorporators or the board, as applicable, entitled “Restated Articles of Incorporation of (insert name of corporation)” which shall set forth the articles as amended to the date of filing of the certificate, except that the signatures and acknowledgments of the articles by the incorporators and any statements regarding the effect of any prior amendment upon memberships and any provisions of agreements of
 merger (other than amendments to the articles of the surviving corporation), and the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation, and the names and addresses of the first directors and of the initial agent for service of process shall be omitted (except that the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation and the names and addresses of the initial agent for service of process and, if previously set forth in the articles, the initial directors, shall not be omitted prior to the time that the corporation has filed a statement under Section 8210). Such omissions are not alterations or amendments of the articles. The certificate may also itself alter or amend the articles in any respect, in which case the certificate must comply with Section 7814 or 7815, as the case may be, and Section 7816.

(b) If the certificate does not itself alter or amend the articles in any respect, it shall be approved by the board or, prior to the issuance of any memberships and the naming and election of directors, by a majority of the incorporators, and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to an amendment of the articles not requiring approval of the members (Section 5034). If the certificate does itself alter or amend the articles, it shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to the amendment or amendments so made.

(c) Restated articles of incorporation filed pursuant to this section shall supersede for all purposes the original articles and all amendments filed prior thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 494, Sec. 22.   (SB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7820.

(a) Amendment of the articles of a corporation holding property in charitable trust, pursuant to this chapter, does not, of itself, abrogate any requirement or limitation imposed upon the corporation, or any property held by it, by virtue of the trust under which such property is held by the corporation.

(b) The Attorney General may, at the corporation’s request, and pursuant to such regulations as the Attorney General may issue, give rulings as to whether the Attorney General will or may oppose a proposed action, or article amendment, as inconsistent with or proscribed by the requirements of a charitable trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Sales of Assets [7910. - 7914.]

7910.

Any mortgage, deed of trust, pledge or other hypothecation of all or any part of the corporation’s property, real or personal, for the purpose of securing the payment or performance of any contract or obligation may be approved by the board. Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, no approval of the members (Section 5034) shall be necessary for such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7911.

(a) Subject to the provisions of Section 7142, a corporation may sell, lease, convey, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its assets when the principal terms are:

(1) Approved by the board; and

(2) Unless the transaction is in the usual and regular course of its activities, approved by the members (Section 5034), either before or after approval by the board and before or after the transaction.

(b) Notwithstanding approval by the members (Section 5034), the board may abandon the proposed transaction without further action by the members, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties.

(c) Subject to the provisions of Section 7142, such sale, lease, conveyance, exchange, transfer or other disposition may be made upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration as the board may deem in the best interests of the corporation. The consideration may be money, property, or securities of any domestic corporation, foreign corporation, or foreign business corporation or any of them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

7912.

Any deed or instrument conveying or otherwise transferring any assets of a corporation may have annexed to it the certificate of the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation, setting forth that the transaction has been validly approved by the board and (a) stating that the property described in such deed or instrument is less than substantially all of the assets of the corporation or that the transfer is in the usual and regular course of the business of the corporation, if such be the case, or (b) if such property constitutes all or substantially all of the assets of the corporation and the transfer is not in the usual and regular course of the business of the corporation, stating the fact of approval thereof by the members (Section 5034) or all the members pursuant to this chapter. Such certificate is prima facie evidence of the existence of the facts authorizing such conveyance or other transfer of the assets and conclusive evidence in favor of any purchaser or encumbrancer for value who, without notice of any trust restriction applicable to the property or any failure to comply therewith, in good faith parted with value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7913.

A corporation holding assets in charitable trust must give written notice to the Attorney General 20 days before it sells, leases, conveys, exchanges, transfers or otherwise disposes of any or all of the assets held in trust unless the Attorney General has given the corporation a written waiver of this section as to the proposed transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7914.

The provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 5914) of Chapter 9 of Part 2 apply to mutual benefit corporations to the extent provided therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 17.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Mergers [8010. - 8022.]



  ARTICLE 1. Merger [8010. - 8019.1.]

8010.

A mutual benefit corporation may merge with any domestic corporation, foreign corporation, foreign business corporation, or other business entity (Section 5063.5). However, a merger with a public benefit corporation, or a religious corporation, or an unincorporated association, the governing documents of which provide that its assets are irrevocably dedicated to charitable, religious, or public purposes, must have the prior written consent of the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 18.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8011.

The board of each corporation that desires to merge shall approve an agreement of merger. The constituent corporations shall be parties to the agreement of merger and other persons may be parties to the agreement of merger. The agreement shall state all of the following:

(a) The terms and conditions of the merger.

(b) The amendments, subject to Sections 7810 and 7816, to the articles of the surviving corporation to be effected by the merger, if any; if any amendment changes the name of the surviving corporation, the new name may be the same as or similar to the name of a disappearing corporation, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 7122.

(c) The amendments to the bylaws of the surviving corporation to be effected by the merger, if any.

(d) The name and place of incorporation of each constituent corporation and which of the constituent corporations is the surviving corporation.

(e) The manner, if any, of converting memberships or securities of the constituent corporations into memberships or securities of the surviving corporation and, if any memberships or securities of any of the constituent corporations are not to be converted solely into memberships or securities of the surviving corporation, the cash, property, rights or securities of any corporation that the holders of those memberships or securities are to receive in exchange for the memberships or securities, which cash, property, rights or securities of any corporation may be in addition to or in lieu of memberships or securities of the surviving corporation, or that the memberships are to be canceled without consideration.

(f) Other details or provisions as are desired, if any, including, without limitation, if not prohibited by this chapter, a provision for the payment of cash in lieu of fractional memberships or for any other arrangement with respect thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 453, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8011.5.

Each membership of the same class of any constituent corporation (other than the cancellation of memberships held by a surviving corporation or its parent or a wholly owned subsidiary of either in a constituent corporation) shall be treated equally with respect to any distribution of cash, property, rights or securities unless: (a) all members of the class consent or (b) the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation has approved the terms and conditions of the transaction and the fairness of the terms pursuant to Section 25142.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 56.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8012.

The principal terms of the merger shall be approved by the members (Section 5034) of each class of each constituent corporation and by each other person or persons whose approval of an amendment of articles is required by the articles; and the approval by the members (Section 5034) or such other person or persons required by this section may be given before or after the approval by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

8013.

Each constituent corporation shall sign the agreement by the chairperson of its board, president or a vice president, and secretary or an assistant secretary acting on behalf of their respective corporations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 65.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8014.

After approval of a merger by the board and any approval by the members (Section 5034) required by Section 8012, the surviving corporation shall file a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of each constituent corporation attached stating the total number of memberships of each class entitled to vote on the merger, identifying any other person or persons whose approval is required, and that the principal terms of the agreement in the form attached were duly approved by the required vote of the members and, if applicable, any other person or persons. The merger and any amendment of the articles of the surviving corporation contained in the merger agreement shall thereupon be effective (subject to subdivision (c) of Section 5008 and subject to the provisions of Section 8018) and the several parties thereto shall be one corporation. The Secretary of State may certify a copy of the merger agreement separate from the officers’ certificates attached thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 22.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8015.

(a) Any amendment to the agreement may be adopted and the agreement so amended may be approved by the board and, if it changes any of the principal terms of the agreement, by the members (Section 5034) or other person or persons, as required by Section 8012, of any constituent corporation in the same manner as the original agreement.

(b) If the agreement so amended is approved as provided in subdivision (a), the agreement so amended shall then constitute the agreement of merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

8016.

The board may, in its discretion, abandon a merger, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties, including other constituent corporations, without further approval by the members (Section 5034) or other persons entitled to approve the merger at any time before the merger is effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 662, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

8017.

A copy of an agreement of merger certified on or after the effective date by an official having custody thereof has the same force in evidence as the original and, except as against the state, is conclusive evidence of the performance of all conditions precedent to the merger, the existence on the effective date of the surviving corporation and the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of any amendment to the articles contained in the agreement of merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8018.

(a) Subject to the provisions of Section 8010, the merger of any number of corporations with any number of foreign corporations, foreign business corporations or domestic corporations may be effected if the foreign corporations are authorized by the laws under which they are formed to effect the merger. The surviving corporation may be any one of the constituent corporations and shall continue to exist under the laws of the state or place of its incorporation.

(b) If the surviving corporation is a mutual benefit corporation, the merger proceedings with respect to that corporation and any domestic disappearing corporation shall conform to the provisions of this chapter and other applicable laws of this state, but if the surviving corporation is a foreign corporation, then, subject to the requirements of subdivision (d) and Section 8012 the merger proceedings may be in accordance with the laws of the state or place of incorporation of the surviving corporation.

(c) If the surviving corporation is a mutual benefit corporation, the agreement and the officers’ certificate of each constituent corporation shall be filed as provided in Section 8014 and thereupon, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 5008, the merger shall be effective as to each corporation; and each foreign disappearing corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall, by virtue of the filing, automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business.

(d) If the surviving corporation is a foreign corporation, or foreign business corporation, the merger shall become effective in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which it is organized, but shall be effective as to any disappearing corporation as of the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction upon the filing in this state as required by this subdivision. There shall be filed as to the domestic disappearing corporation or corporations the documents described in any one of the following paragraphs:

(1) A copy of the agreement, certificate, or other document filed by the surviving foreign corporation in the state or place of its incorporation for the purpose of effecting the merger, which copy shall be certified by the public officer having official custody of the original.

(2) An executed counterpart of the agreement, certificate, or other document filed by the surviving corporation in the state or place of its incorporation for the purpose of effecting the merger.

(3) A copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of the surviving foreign corporation and of each constituent domestic corporation attached, which officers’ certificates shall conform to the requirements of Section 8014.

(e) If the date of the filing in this state pursuant to subdivision (d) is more than six months after the time of the effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, or if the powers of the domestic corporation are suspended at the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, the merger shall be effective as to the domestic disappearing corporation or corporations as of the date of filing in this state. Each foreign disappearing corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall automatically by the filing pursuant to subdivision (d) surrender its right to transact intrastate business as of the date of filing in this state regardless of the time of effectiveness as to a domestic disappearing corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 23.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8019.

If an agreement of merger is entered into between a nonprofit corporation and a business corporation: (a) Sections 6011, 6012, 6014, and 6015 shall apply to any constituent public benefit corporation; (b) Sections 8011, 8011.5, 8012, 8014, and 8015 shall apply to any constituent mutual benefit corporation; (c) Sections 6014 and 6015 and subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 9640 shall apply to any constituent religious corporation; and (d) Sections 1101, 1101.1, 1103, and 1104 shall apply to any constituent business corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

8019.1.

(a) Subject to the provisions of Section 8010, any one or more corporations may merge with one or more other business entities (Section 5063.5). One or more other domestic corporations, foreign corporations (Section 5053), and foreign business corporations (Section 5052) may be parties to the merger. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, such a merger may be effected only if:

(1) In a merger in which a domestic corporation or domestic other business entity is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(2) In a merger in which a foreign corporation or foreign business
 corporation is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(3) In a merger in which a foreign other business entity is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(b) Each corporation and each other party which desires to merge shall approve an agreement of merger. The board and the members (Section 5034) of each corporation which desires to merge, and each other person or persons, if any, whose approval of an amendment of the articles of that corporation is required by the articles or bylaws shall approve the agreement of merger. The agreement of merger shall be approved on behalf of each other constituent party by those persons authorized or required to approve the merger by the laws under
 which it is organized. The parties desiring to merge shall be parties to the agreement of merger and other persons, including a parent party (Section 5064.5), may be parties to the agreement of merger. The agreement of merger shall state all of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the merger.

(2) The name and place of incorporation or organization of each party and the identity of the surviving party.

(3) The amendments, if any, subject to Sections 7810 and 7816, to the articles of the surviving corporation, if applicable, to be effected by the merger. The name of the surviving corporation may be, subject to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 7122, the same as or similar to the name of a disappearing party to
 the merger.

(4) The manner, if any, of converting the memberships or securities of each of the constituent corporations into shares, memberships, interests, or other securities of the surviving party; and, if any memberships or securities of any of the constituent corporations are not to be converted solely into shares, memberships, interests, or other securities of the surviving party, cash, rights, securities, or other property which the holders of those memberships or securities are to receive in exchange for the memberships or securities, which cash, rights, securities, or other property may be in addition to or in lieu of shares, memberships, interests, or other securities of the surviving party.

(5) Any other details or provisions required by the laws under which
 any party to the merger is organized, including, if an unincorporated association is a party to the merger, Section 18370, or if a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 15911.12, or, if a domestic general partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 16911, or, if a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 17710.12.

(6) Any other details or provisions as are desired.

(c) Each membership of the same class of any constituent corporation (other than the cancellation of memberships held by a party to the merger or its parent or a wholly owned subsidiary of either in another constituent corporation) shall be treated equally with respect to any distribution of cash, property, rights,
 or securities unless (i) all members of the class consent or (ii) the commissioner has approved the terms and conditions of the transaction and the fairness of those terms pursuant to Section 25142.

(d) Notwithstanding its prior approval, an agreement of merger may be amended prior to the filing of the agreement of merger if the amendment is approved by each constituent corporation in the same manner as the original agreement of merger. If the agreement of merger as so amended and approved is also approved by each of the other parties to the agreement of merger, as so amended it shall then constitute the agreement of merger.

(e) The board of a constituent corporation may, in its discretion, abandon a merger, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties,
 including other parties to the agreement of merger, without further approval by the members (Section 5034) or other persons, at any time before the merger is effective.

(f) Each constituent corporation shall sign the agreement of merger by its chairperson of the board, president, or a vice president and also by its secretary or an assistant secretary acting on behalf of their respective corporations.

(g) After required approvals of the merger by each constituent
 corporation and each other party to the merger, the surviving party shall file a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of each constituent domestic corporation, foreign corporation, and foreign business corporation attached stating the total number of outstanding shares or membership interests of each class entitled to vote on the merger (and identifying any other person or persons whose approval is required), that the agreement of merger in the form attached or its principal terms, as required, were approved by that corporation by a vote of a number of shares or membership interests of each class which equaled or exceeded the vote required, specifying each class entitled to vote required of each class, and, if applicable, by such other person or persons whose approval is required.

If equity securities of a parent
 party (Section 5064.5) are to be issued in the merger, the officers’ certificate or certificate of merger of the controlled party shall state either that no vote of the shareholders of the parent party was required or that the required vote was obtained. The merger and any amendment of the articles of the surviving corporation, if applicable, contained in the agreement of merger shall be effective upon the filing of the agreement of merger, subject to the provisions of subdivision (i). If a domestic reciprocal insurer organized after 1974 to provide medical malpractice insurance is a party to the merger, the agreement of merger or certificate of merger shall not be filed until there has been filed the certificate issued by the Insurance Commissioner approving the merger pursuant to Section 1555 of the Insurance Code.

In lieu of an officers’ certificate, a
 certificate of merger, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, shall be filed for each constituent other business entity. The certificate of merger shall be executed and acknowledged by each domestic constituent limited liability company by all of the managers of the limited liability company (unless a lesser number is specified in its articles of organization or operating agreement) and by each domestic constituent limited partnership by all general partners (unless a lesser number is provided in its certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement) and by each domestic constituent general partnership by two partners (unless a lesser number is provided in its partnership agreement) and by each foreign constituent limited liability company by one or more managers and by each foreign constituent general partnership or foreign constituent limited partnership by one or more general
 partners, and by each constituent reciprocal insurer by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and by the secretary or assistant secretary, or, if a constituent reciprocal insurer has not appointed such officers, by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and by the secretary or assistant secretary of the
 constituent reciprocal insurer’s attorney-in-fact, and by each other party to the merger by those persons required or authorized to execute the certificate of merger by the laws under which that party is organized, specifying for such party the provision of law or other basis for the authority of the signing persons.

The certificate of merger shall set forth, if a vote of the shareholders, members, partners, or other holders of interests of a constituent other business entity was required, a statement setting forth the total number of outstanding interests of each class entitled to vote on the merger and that the principal terms of the agreement of merger were approved by a vote of the number of interests of each class which equaled or exceeded the vote required, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class,
 and any other information required to be set forth under the laws under which the constituent other business entity is organized, including, if a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14, if a domestic general partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (b) of Section 16915 and, if a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 17710.14. The certificate of merger for each constituent foreign other business entity, if any, shall also set forth the statutory or other basis under which that foreign other business entity is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

The Secretary of State may certify a copy of the agreement of merger separate from the officers’ certificates and certificates of merger attached thereto.

(h) A copy of an agreement of merger certified on or after the effective date by an official having custody thereof has the same force in evidence as the original and, except as against the state, is conclusive evidence of the performance of all conditions precedent to the merger, the existence on the effective date of the surviving party to the merger, the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of any amendment to the articles, if applicable, contained in the agreement of merger, and of the merger of the constituent corporations, either by themselves or together with other constituent parties, into the surviving party to the merger.

(i) (1) The merger of domestic corporations with foreign corporations or foreign other business entities in a
 merger in which one or more other business entities is a party shall comply with subdivisions (a) and (g) and this subdivision.

(2) Subject to subdivision (c) of Section 5008 and paragraph (3), the merger shall be effective as to each domestic constituent corporation and domestic constituent other business entity upon filing of the agreement of merger with attachments as provided in subdivision (g).

(3) If the surviving party is a foreign corporation or foreign business corporation or foreign other business entity, except as provided in paragraph (4), the merger shall be effective as to any domestic disappearing corporation as of the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction upon the filing in this state of a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate
 of the surviving foreign corporation or foreign business corporation and of each constituent foreign and domestic corporation and a certificate of merger of each constituent other business entity attached, which officers’ certificates and certificates of merger shall conform to the requirements of subdivision (g).

If one or more domestic other business entities is a disappearing party in a merger pursuant to this subdivision in which a foreign other business entity is the surviving entity, a certificate of merger required by the laws under which each domestic other business entity is organized, including subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14, subdivision (b) of Section 16915, or subdivision (a) of Section 17710.14, if applicable, shall also be filed at the same time as the filing of the agreement of merger.

(4) If the date of the filing in this state pursuant to this subdivision is more than six months after the time of the effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, or if the powers of a domestic disappearing corporation are suspended at the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, the merger shall be effective as to the domestic disappearing corporation as of the date of filing in this state.

(5) Each foreign disappearing corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall automatically by the filing pursuant to subdivision (g) surrender its right to transact intrastate business as of the date of filing in this state or, if later, the effective date of the merger. With respect to each foreign disappearing other business entity previously registered for the transaction of intrastate business in
 this state, the filing of the agreement of merger pursuant to subdivision (g) automatically has the effect of a cancellation of registration for that foreign other business entity as of the date of filing in this state or, if later, the effective date of the merger, without the necessity of the filing of a certificate of cancellation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 12.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Effect of Merger [8020. - 8022.]

8020.

(a) Upon merger pursuant to this chapter the separate existences of the disappearing parties to the merger cease and the surviving party to the merger shall succeed, without other transfer, to all the rights and property of each of the disappearing parties to the merger and shall be subject to all the debts and liabilities of each and trust obligations upon the property of a disappearing party in the same manner as if incurred by the surviving party to the merger.

(b) All rights of creditors and all liens and trusts upon or arising from the property of each of the constituent corporations and other parties to the merger shall be preserved unimpaired, provided that the liens and trust obligations upon property of a disappearing party shall be limited to the property affected thereby immediately prior to the time the merger is effective.

(c) Any action or proceeding pending by or against any disappearing corporation or other party to the merger may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the surviving party to the merger, or the surviving party to the merger may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8020.5.

(a) Upon merger pursuant to this chapter, a surviving domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity shall be deemed to have assumed the liability of each disappearing domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity that is taxed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of, or under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of, Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the following:

(1) To prepare and file, or to cause to be prepared and filed, tax and information returns otherwise required of that disappearing entity as specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18501) of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) To pay any tax liability determined to be due.

(b) If the surviving entity is a domestic limited liability company, domestic corporation, or registered limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability company, foreign limited liability partnership, or foreign corporation that is registered or qualified to do business in California, the Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 25.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8021.

Whenever a domestic or foreign or foreign business corporation or other business entity (Section 5063.5) having any real property in this state merges with another domestic or foreign or foreign business corporation or other business entity pursuant to the laws of this state or of the state or place in which any constituent party to the merger was organized, and the laws of the state or place of organization (including this state) of any disappearing party to the merger provide substantially that the making and filing of the agreement of merger vests in the surviving party to the merger all the real property of any disappearing party to the merger, the filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state in which any of the real property of the disappearing party to the merger is located of either (a) a certificate prescribed by the Secretary of State, or (b) a copy of the agreement of merger or certificate of merger, certified by the Secretary of State or an authorized public official of the state or place pursuant to the laws of which the merger is effected, shall evidence record ownership in the surviving party to the merger of all interest of such disappearing party to the merger in and to the real property located in that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8022.

Any bequest, devise, gift, grant, or promise contained in a will or other instrument of donation, subscription, or conveyance, which is made to a constituent corporation and which takes effect or remains payable after the merger, inures to the surviving party to the merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Bankruptcy Reorganizations and Arrangements [8110. - 8110.]

8110.

Any proceeding, initiated with respect to a corporation, under any applicable statute of the United States, as now existing or hereafter enacted, relating to reorganizations of corporations, shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 1400) of Division 1 of Title 1, and for this purpose the reference in Chapter 14 to “shareholders” shall be deemed to be a reference to members and the reference to “this division” shall be deemed to be a reference to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 21.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Required Filings by Corporation or Its Agent [8210. - 8217.]

8210.

(a) Every corporation shall, within 90 days after the filing of its original articles and biennially thereafter during the applicable filing period, file, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, a statement containing: (1) the name of the corporation and the Secretary of State’s file number; (2) the names and complete business or residence addresses of its chief executive officer, secretary, and chief financial officer; (3) the street address of its principal office in California, if any; (4) the mailing address of the corporation, if different from the street address of its principal office or if the corporation has no principal office address in California and (5) if the corporation chooses to receive renewal notices and any other
 notifications from the Secretary of State by electronic mail instead of by United States mail, a valid electronic mail address for the corporation or for the corporation’s designee to receive those notices.
